Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-735.04
District; location; basis for determination.

For purposes of sections 31-735 to 31-735.02 a sanitary and improvement district shall be deemed to be located in a county with a population of one hundred thousand or more if the greater proportion in area of the district is located in such county.

Laws 1982, LB 359, § 4.